Massachusetts, session 194th, H1002.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 35BBB of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “$1” and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- “$5”
of 1